Massachusetts, session 194th, H4358.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 93 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting after section 107 the following new section:-
Section 107A. (a) As used in this section the following words shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
"Authorized wheelchair dealer", any company doing business in the state selling or
leasing wheelchairs, including complex rehabilitation technology wheelchairs.
"Complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair", a specialized, medically necessary
manual or powered wheelchair individually configured for the user with specialized equipment
that requires evaluation, configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term
maintenance and repair services.
of 6

"Consumer", the purchaser or lessee of a wheelchair, including a complex rehabilitation
technology wheelchair, irrespective of whether the purchase or lease of the wheelchair is funded
in whole or in part by the consumer or privately or publicly funded health insurance.
"Timely repair", as soon as practicable but not later than ten business days after the date
of request for repair from a consumer that makes the wheelchair available and any prior
authorization required from an insurer has been acquired; provided, any time spent waiting for
prior authorization from an insurer or for delivery of necessary parts ordered for the repair by an
authorized wheelchair dealer shall not be included in the ten business days.
"Wheelchair", a manual or motorized wheeled device that enhances the mobility or
positioning of an individual with a disability and includes a complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair.
(b) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall timely repair a wheelchair, including a complex
rehabilitation technology wheelchair, sold or leased by such dealer in the state. An authorized
wheelchair dealer who sells or leases a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair in the state
shall provide timely repair of such wheelchair at a consumer's home upon request.
(c) An authorized wheelchair dealer shall maintain an electronic mail address and a
phone line for consumer repair requests that are accessible each business day and capable of
receiving and recording messages. The authorized wheelchair dealer shall respond to a request
for wheelchair repair not later than one business day after the date of request, and order parts for
a repair not later than three business days after assessing the need for the repair or after receiving
prior authorization from an insurer for the repair.
of 6

(d) Manufacturers or other authorized wheelchair dealers shall fill all repair and
replacement orders for wheelchairs pursuant to this section from their own inventory or have a
written subcontract for the purchase of items necessary to fill repair and replacement orders;
provided, however, that the subcontract shall be in writing and contain, at a minimum: (i) names,
addresses, phone numbers and contact information for both entities; (ii) the contract term start
and end dates; (iii) a description of the wheelchairs covered under the subcontract and the cost of
each item; (iv) signatures of both parties, including signature dates and position titles; (v) an
established credit limit that is reasonable, based on the value of the products and services to be
provided by the contractor; and (vi) a provision requiring shipping of parts, whenever feasible,
by overnight mail.
(e) (1) Nothing contained in this section shall be deemed to limit any rights or remedies
available to a consumer under any other law. Any waiver by a consumer of rights under this
section shall be void.
(2) In addition to pursuing any other remedy, a consumer may bring an action to recover
for damages caused by a violation of this section. The court shall award a consumer who prevails
in such an action twice the amount of any pecuniary loss, together with costs, disbursements and
reasonable attorney fees, and any equitable relief that the court deems is appropriate.
(f) The attorney general shall promulgate such rules and regulations as deemed necessary
for the interpretation, implementation, administration, and enforcement of this section. Such
authority shall be in addition to the attorney general's authority to promulgate rules and
regulations under section 2 of chapter 93A.
of 6

SECTION. 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 10Q the following section:-
Section 10R. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair” shall mean a specialized, medically necessary manual or powered wheelchair
individually configured for the user with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term maintenance and repair services.
The division and its contracted health insurers, health plans, health maintenance
organizations, behavioral health management firms and third-party administrators under contract
to a Medicaid managed care organization or primary care clinician plan shall not require a
preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair unless the
original prescription is more than five years old.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 47UU the following section:-
Section 47VV. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair” shall mean a specialized, medically necessary manual or powered wheelchair
individually configured for the user with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term maintenance and repair services.
Any policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued, delivered or
renewed within the commonwealth, which is considered creditable coverage under section 1 of
chapter 111M, shall not require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a
complex rehabilitation technology wheelchair unless the original prescription is more than five
years old.
of 6

SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 8VV the following section:-
Section 8WW. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair” shall mean a specialized, medically necessary manual or powered wheelchair
individually configured for the user with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term maintenance and repair services.
Any contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or group
hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not
require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation
technology wheelchair unless the original prescription is more than five years old.
SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4VV the following section:-
Section 4WW. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair” shall mean a specialized, medically necessary manual or powered wheelchair
individually configured for the user with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term maintenance and repair services.
Any subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service agreement
delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall not require a member to unless the
original prescription is more than five years old.
SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
inserting after section 4NN the following section:-
of 6

Section 4OO. For purposes of this section, “complex rehabilitation technology
wheelchair” shall mean a specialized, medically necessary manual or powered wheelchair
individually configured for the user with specialized equipment that requires evaluation,
configuration, fitting, adjustment, programming and long-term maintenance and repair services.
100 Any individual or group health maintenance contract that is issued or renewed shall not
101 require a member to obtain a preauthorization for any repair of a complex rehabilitation
102 technology wheelchair unless the original prescription is more than five years old.
103 SECTION 7. Section 25 of chapter 176O of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby
104 amended by inserting after the word “services”, in line 49, the following words:- ; provided,
105 however, that a health plan shall not require a prior authorization for any repair of a complex
106 rehabilitation technology wheelchair unless the original prescription is more than five years old.
of 6